notebooks/resources/lvLex.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

plān N1dekl;
metr N1dekl;
klan N1dekl;
cirv N2dekl;
pūsl N2dekl;
ķirb N2dekl;
klep N3dekl;
al   N3dekl;
liet N3dekl;
meit N4dekl;
kann N4dekl;
puik N4dekl;
peļķ N5dekl;
plēv N5dekl;
lell N5dekl;
sird N6dekl;
bals N6dekl;
nakt N6dekl;
birz N6dekl;

LEXICON N1dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N2dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Ma  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^im #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^Mi  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^Miem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Mus #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^Mos #;

LEXICON N3dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^us  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N4dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^as #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ai #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^as  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ām #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^as #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ās #;

LEXICON N5dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^e  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs #;

LEXICON N6dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ij #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs #;
